California, session 20252026, AB1479.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2006.7 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:2006.7. Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Tehama may abolish the office of road commissioner if the board transfers all duties of the road commissioner to the county director of the department of public works. The director of that department shall not be required to have any special permit, registration, or license. Any civil engineering functions that are required to be performed by the road commissioner shall be performed by a registered civil engineer acting under the authority of the director of that department.SEC. 2. Section 2006.8 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:2006.8. Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Madera may abolish the office of road commissioner if the board transfers all duties of the road commissioner to the county director of the department of public works. The director of that department shall not be required to have any special permit, registration, or license. Any civil engineering functions that are required to be performed by the road commissioner shall be performed by a registered civil engineer acting under the authority of the director of that department.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the particular needs of the Counties of Madera and Tehama, including difficulty in finding properly qualified candidates for the position of county road commissioner.